Washington statutes.
RCW 5.56.100

Affidavit to procure order.

Such order can only be made upon affidavit, showing the nature of the action or proceeding, the testimony expected from the witness, and its materiality.

[Code 1881 s 402; 1877 p 88 s 404; 1869 p 106 s 397; 1854 p 189 s 304; RRS s 1224.]